Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1222, subdivision 2d, is amended to read: Subd. 2d. Hot tubs on rental deleted text begin houseboatsdeleted text end new text begin propertynew text end . (a) A hot water pool intended for seated recreational use, including a hot tub or whirlpool, that is located on deleted text begin a houseboatdeleted text end new text begin propertynew text end that is rented to the public is not a public pool and is exempt from the requirements for public pools under new text begin this section and new text end Minnesota Rules, chapter 4717. (b) new text begin A hot water pool intended for seated recreational use, including a hot tub or whirlpool, that is located on the property of a stand-alone single-unit rental property that is rented by the property owner or through a resort, and that is only intended to be used by the occupants of the rental property, is not a public pool and is exempt from the requirements for public pools under this section and Minnesota Rules, chapter 4717.new text end new text begin (c) new text end A hot water pool under this subdivision must be conspicuously posted with the following notice to renters: "NOTICE This spa is exempt from state and local sanitary requirements that prevent disease transmission. USE AT YOUR OWN RISK This notice is required under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.1222, subdivision 2d."